Nebraska, session 109, LB172.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-1463.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
28-1463.01 Sections 1 to 6 of this act 28-1463.01 to 28-1463.06
shall be known and may be cited as the Child Pornography Prevention Act.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1463.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1463.02 As used in the Child Pornography Prevention Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Child, in the case of a participant, means any person under the
age of eighteen years and, in the case of a portrayed observer, means any
person under the age of sixteen years;
(2) Child pornography means any:
(a) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct that has a child,
other than the defendant, as one of its participants or portrayed
observers; or
(b) Computer-generated child pornography;
(3) Computer-generated, with respect to a visual depiction, means
that a visual depiction has been created, adapted, or modified by using a
computer, digital program or process, artificial intelligence, or any
similar device or means;
(4) Computer-generated child pornography means any computer-
generated visual depiction of an individual indistinguishable from a real
child, other than the defendant, that has been created, adapted, or
modified to depict such individual as a participant in, or portrayed
observer of, sexually explicit conduct;
(5)(a) Conviction or convicted includes a plea or verdict of guilty
or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.
(b) Conviction or convicted includes a conviction that has been set
aside under section 29-2264.
(c) Conviction or convicted does not include a conviction for which
a pardon has been obtained;
-2-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(6) Covered offense means a violation of section 28-308, 28-309,
28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320.01,
28-833, or section 3, 4, or 5 of this act, or subsection (1) or (2) of
section 28-320;
(7) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in
section 28-833;
(8) (2) Erotic fondling means touching a person's clothed or
unclothed genitals or pubic area, breasts if the person is a female, or
developing breast area if the person is a female child, for the purpose
of real or simulated overt sexual gratification or sexual stimulation of
one or more persons involved. Erotic fondling shall not be construed to
include physical contact, even if affectionate, which is not for the
purpose of real or simulated overt sexual gratification or sexual
stimulation of one or more of the persons involved;
(9) (3) Erotic nudity means the display of the human male or female
genitals or pubic area, the human female breasts, or the developing
breast area of the human female child, for the purpose of real or
simulated overt sexual gratification or sexual stimulation of one or more
of the persons involved;
(10) Indistinguishable, when used with respect to a visual
depiction, means that a visual depiction is virtually indistinguishable
from a depiction of a real or actual event or occurrence, such that an
ordinary person would reasonably conclude that the visual depiction is of
a real child as a participant in, or portrayed observer of, sexually
explicit conduct;
(11) (4) Sadomasochistic abuse means flagellation or torture by or
upon a nude person or a person clad in undergarments, a mask, or bizarre
costume, or the condition of being fettered, bound, or otherwise
physically restrained when performed to predominantly appeal to the
morbid interest;
(12) (5) Sexually explicit conduct means: (a) Real or simulated
-3-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
intercourse, whether genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or
oral-anal between persons of the same or opposite sex or between a human
and an animal or with an artificial genital; (b) real or simulated
masturbation; (c) real or simulated sadomasochistic abuse; (d) erotic
fondling; (e) erotic nudity; or (f) real or simulated defecation or
urination for the purpose of sexual gratification or sexual stimulation
of one or more of the persons involved; and
(13) (6) Visual depiction means live performance or photographic
representation and includes any undeveloped film or videotape or data
stored on a computer disk or by other electronic means which is capable
of conversion into a visual image and also includes any photograph, film,
video, picture, digital image, or computer-displayed image, video, or
picture, whether made or produced by electronic, mechanical, computer,
digital, or other means.
Sec. 3. Section 28-813.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-813.01 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person nineteen years of
age or older to knowingly possess or receive any child pornography visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its
participants or portrayed observers. Violation of this subsection is a
Class IIA felony.
(2)(a) (2) It shall be unlawful for a person under nineteen years of
age to knowingly and intentionally possess or receive any child
pornography visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a
child other than the defendant as one of its participants or portrayed
observers.
(b) Violation of this subsection is a Class I misdemeanor. A second
or subsequent conviction under this subsection is a Class IV felony.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge made pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section that:
(a) (a)(i) The defendant was less than nineteen years of age;
-4-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(b) The child pornography:
(i) Portrays (ii) the visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct
portrays a child who is fifteen years of age or older;
(ii) Was (iii) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily
generated by the child depicted therein;
(iii) Was (iv) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily
provided by such the child depicted in the visual depiction; and
(iv) Portrays (v) the visual depiction contains only one child other
than the defendant;
(c) The (vi) the defendant has not provided or made available the
child pornography visual depiction to another person except such the
child depicted who originally sent the visual depiction to the defendant;
and
(d) The (vii) the defendant did not coerce such the child in the
visual depiction to either create or send the child pornography. visual
depiction; or
(4) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge made pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section that:
(a) (b)(i) The defendant was less than eighteen years of age;
(b) The (ii) the difference in age between the defendant and the
child portrayed is less than four years;
(c) The child pornography:
(i) Was (iii) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily
generated by the child depicted therein;
(ii) Was (iv) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily
provided by such the child depicted in the visual depiction; and
(iii) Portrays (v) the visual depiction contains only one child
other than the defendant;
(d) The (vi) the defendant has not provided or made available the
child pornography visual depiction to another person except such the
child depicted who originally sent the visual depiction to the defendant;
-5-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
and
(e) The (vii) the defendant did not coerce such the child in the
visual depiction to either create or send the child pornography visual
depiction.
(5) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, any
(4) Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section and who
has previously been convicted of a covered offense violation of this
section or section 28-308, 28-309, 28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314,
28-315, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320.01, 28-833, 28-1463.03, or 28-1463.05
or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320 shall be guilty of a Class IC
felony for each offense.
(5) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, a
sentencing court may order that any money, securities, negotiable
instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic communication devices
as defined in section 28-833 or any equipment, components, peripherals,
software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication
devices be forfeited as a part of the sentence imposed if it finds by
clear and convincing evidence adduced at a separate hearing in the same
prosecution, conducted pursuant to section 28-1601, that any or all such
property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a
violation of this section.
(6) The definitions in section 28-1463.02 shall apply to this
section.
Sec. 4. Section 28-1463.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1463.05 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly
possess with intent to rent, sell, deliver, distribute, trade, or provide
to any person any child pornography visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct which has a child other than the defendant as one of its
participants or portrayed observers.
(2)(a) Any person who is under nineteen years of age at the time he
-6-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
or she violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IIIA felony for
each offense.
(b) Any person who is nineteen years of age or older at the time he
or she violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony for
each offense.
(c) Any person who violates this section and who has previously been
convicted of a covered offense violation of this section or section
28-308, 28-309, 28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319,
28-319.01, 28-320.01, 28-813, 28-833, or 28-1463.03 or subsection (1) or
(2) of section 28-320 shall be guilty of a Class IC felony for each
offense.
Sec. 5. Section 28-1463.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1463.03 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly make,
publish, direct, create, provide, or in any manner generate any child
pornography visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a
child other than the defendant as one of its participants or portrayed
observers.
(2) It shall be unlawful for a person knowingly to purchase, rent,
sell, deliver, distribute, display for sale, advertise, trade, or provide
to any person any child pornography visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct which has a child other than the defendant as one of its
participants or portrayed observers.
(3) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly employ, force,
authorize, induce, or otherwise cause a child to appear or be depicted in
any child pornography engage in any visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed
observers.
(4) It shall be unlawful for a parent, stepparent, legal guardian,
or any person with custody and control of a child, knowing the content
thereof, to consent to such child appearing or being depicted in any
-7-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
child pornography engaging in any visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed
observers.
(5) Any person who is under nineteen years of age at the time he or
she violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III felony for each
offense.
(6) Any person who is nineteen years of age or older at the time he
or she violates this section shall be guilty of a Class ID felony for
each offense.
(7) Any person who violates this section and who has previously been
convicted of a covered offense shall be guilty of a Class IC felony for
each offense.
Sec. 6. Section 28-1463.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1463.06 In addition to the penalties provided in the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, a sentencing court may order that any money,
securities, negotiable instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic
communication devices as defined in section 28-833 or any equipment,
components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to
electronic communication devices be forfeited as a part of the sentence
imposed if it finds by clear and convincing evidence adduced at a
separate hearing in the same prosecution, conducted pursuant to section
28-1601, that any or all such property was derived from, used, or
intended to be used to facilitate a violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act.
Sec. 7. Section 25-21,291, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-21,291 For purposes of the Exploited Children's Civil Remedy Act:
(1) Access software provider means a provider of software, including
client or server software, or enabling tools that do any one or more of
the following: (a) Filter, screen, allow, or disallow content; (b) pick,
-8-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
choose, analyze, or digest content; or (c) transmit, receive, display,
forward, cache, search, subset, organize, reorganize, or translate
content;
(2) Aid or assist another with the creation, distribution, or active
acquisition of child pornography means help a principal in some
appreciable manner with the creation, distribution, or active acquisition
of a visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as
one of its participants or portrayed observers. The term also includes
knowingly employing, forcing, authorizing, inducing, or otherwise causing
a child to engage in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct
which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers. No
parent, stepparent, legal guardian, or person with custody and control of
a child, knowing the content thereof, may consent to such child engaging
in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as
one of its participants or portrayed observers;
(3) Cable operator means any person or group of persons (a) who
provides cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or
more affiliates owns a significant interest in such cable system or (b)
who otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement,
the management and operation of such a cable system;
(4) Child has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act
28-1463.02;
(5) Create means to knowingly create, make, manufacture, direct,
publish, finance, or in any manner generate;
(6) Distribute means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer
from one person, source, or location to another person, source, or
location. The term includes, but is not limited to, renting, selling,
delivering, displaying, advertising, trading, mailing, procuring,
circulating, lending, exhibiting, transmitting, transmuting,
transferring, disseminating, presenting, or providing any visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its
-9-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
participants or portrayed observers;
(7) Interactive computer service means any information service
system or access software provider that provides or enables computer
access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a
service or system that provides access to the Internet and such systems
operated or services offered by libraries or educational institutions;
(8) Participant means a child who appears in any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct and is portrayed or actively engaged in acts of
sexually explicit conduct appearing therein;
(9) Portrayed observer means a child who appears in any visual
depiction where sexually explicit conduct is likewise portrayed or
occurring within the child's presence or in the child's proximity;
(10) Sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as in section 2
of this act 28-1463.02;
(11) Telecommunications service means the offering of
telecommunications for a fee directly to the public, or to such classes
of users as to be effectively available directly to the public,
regardless of the facilities used; and
(12) Visual depiction has the same meaning as in section 2 of this
act 28-1463.02.
Sec. 8. Section 27-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
27-1301 (1) In any judicial or administrative proceeding, any
property or material that constitutes child pornography a visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct, as defined in section 2 of this
act 28-1463.02, and which has a child, as defined in such section, as one
of its participants or portrayed observers, shall remain constantly and
continuously in the care, custody, and control of law enforcement, the
prosecuting attorney, or the court having properly received it into
evidence, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) All courts and administrative agencies shall unequivocally deny
-10-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
any request by the defendant, his or her attorney, or any other person,
agency, or organization, regardless of whether such defendant, attorney,
or other person, agency, or organization is a party in interest or not,
to acquire possession of, copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise
reproduce any property or material that constitutes child pornography a
visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct, as defined in section 2 of
this act 28-1463.02, and which has a child, as defined in such section,
as one of its participants or portrayed observers, so long as the state
makes the property or material reasonably available to the defendant in a
criminal proceeding. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit
the review of the proscribed materials or property by a federal court
when considering a habeas corpus claim.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, property or material are deemed
to be reasonably available to a defendant if the state provides ample
opportunity for inspection, viewing, examination, and analysis of the
property or material, at a law enforcement or state-operated facility, to
the defendant, his or her attorney, and any individual the defendant
seeks to use for the purpose of furnishing expert testimony.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a court may
order a copy of the property or material to be delivered to a person
identified as a defense expert for the purpose of evaluating the
evidence, subject to the same restrictions placed upon law enforcement.
The defense expert shall return all copies and materials to law
enforcement upon completion of the evaluation.
(4) The On or before July 1, 2009, the Supreme Court shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the proper control, care,
custody, transfer, and disposition of property or material that
constitutes child pornography a visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct, as defined in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02, and which has a
child, as defined in such section, as one of its participants or
portrayed observers, that has been received into evidence at any judicial
-11-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
or administrative proceeding. Among the issues addressed by these rules
and regulations, the Supreme Court should devise procedures regarding the
preparation and delivery of bills of exception containing evidence as
described in this section, as well as procedures for storing, accessing,
and disposing of such bills of exception after preparation and receipt.
Sec. 9. Section 28-116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-116 The changes made to the sections listed in this section by
Laws 2015, LB605, shall not apply to any offense committed prior to
August 30, 2015. Any such offense shall be construed and punished
according to the provisions of law existing at the time the offense was
committed. For purposes of this section, an offense shall be deemed to
have been committed prior to August 30, 2015, if any element of the
offense occurred prior to such date. The following sections are subject
to this provision: Sections 9-262, 9-352, 9-434, 9-652, 23-135.01,
28-105, 28-106, 28-201, 28-204, 28-305, 28-306, 28-309, 28-310.01,
28-311, 28-311.01, 28-311.04, 28-311.08, 28-320, 28-322.02, 28-322.03,
28-322.04, 28-323, 28-393, 28-394, 28-397, 28-416, 28-504, 28-507,
28-514, 28-518, 28-519, 28-603, 28-604, 28-611, 28-611.01, 28-620,
28-621, 28-622, 28-627, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-703, 28-707,
28-813.01, 28-912, 28-932, 28-1005, 28-1009, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1212.03, 28-1222, 28-1224, 28-1344, 28-1345, 28-1463.05, 29-1816,
29-2204, 29-2260, 29-2308, 29-4011, 60-6,197.03, 60-6,197.06, 68-1017,
68-1017.01, 71-2228, and 71-2229 and sections 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 10. Section 28-320.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-320.02 (1) No person shall knowingly solicit, coax, entice, or
lure (a) a child sixteen years of age or younger or (b) a peace officer
who is believed by such person to be a child sixteen years of age or
younger, by means of an electronic communication device as that term is
defined in section 28-833, to engage in an act which would be in
-12-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or
(2) of section 28-320. A person shall not be convicted of both a
violation of this subsection and a violation of section 28-319,
28-319.01, or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320 if the
violations arise out of the same set of facts or pattern of conduct and
the individual solicited, coaxed, enticed, or lured under this subsection
is also the victim of the sexual assault under section 28-319, 28-319.01,
or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a Class ID
felony. If a person who violates this section has previously been
convicted of a covered offense violation of this section or section
28-308, 28-309, 28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319,
28-319.01, 28-320.01, 28-813.01, 28-833, 28-1463.03, or 28-1463.05 or
subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320, the person is guilty of a Class
IC felony.
Sec. 11. Section 28-813.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-813.02 Any commercial film and photographic print processor who
has knowledge of or observes, within the scope of his or her professional
capacity or employment, and who participates in an investigation or the
making of any report pertaining to any film, photograph, videotape,
negative, or slide depicting child pornography a child under the age of
eighteen years engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct, as defined
in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02, or participates in a judicial
proceeding resulting from such participation shall be immune from any
liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or
imposed, except for maliciously false statements.
Sec. 12. Section 28-833, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-833 (1) A person commits the offense of enticement by electronic
communication device if he or she is nineteen years of age or over and
-13-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
knowingly and intentionally utilizes an electronic communication device
to contact a child under sixteen years of age or a peace officer who is
believed by such person to be a child under sixteen years of age and in
so doing:
(a) Uses or transmits any indecent, lewd, lascivious, or obscene
language, writing, or sound;
(b) Transmits or otherwise disseminates any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct as defined in section 28-1463.02; or
(c) Offers or solicits any indecent, lewd, or lascivious act.
(2) Enticement by electronic communication device is a Class IV
felony.
(3) Enticement by electronic communication device is deemed to have
been committed either at the place where the communication was initiated
or where it was received.
(4) For purposes of this section: ,
(a) Electronic electronic communication device means any device
which, in its ordinary and intended use, transmits by electronic means
writings, sounds, visual images, or data of any nature to another
electronic communication device; .
(b) Sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as in section 2
of this act; and
(c) Visual depiction has the same meaning as in section 2 of this
act.
Sec. 13. Section 28-1601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1601 (1) For purposes of sections 28-1601 to 28-1603:
(a) Covered offense means a violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-1102,
28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107;
(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in
section 28-833; and
-14-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(c) Gambling device has the same meaning as in section 28-1101.
(2) (1) In addition to existing penalties for a violation of a
covered offense the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107, a court may order forfeiture of any money,
securities, negotiable instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic
communication devices; as defined in section 28-833, any equipment,
components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to
electronic communication devices; , or any gambling devices as defined in
section 28-1101 if:
(a) The owner or possessor of the property has been convicted of a
covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act,
subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107;
(b) The information charging such violation specifically requests
the forfeiture of property upon conviction and is prepared pursuant to
section 28-1602; and
(c) It The property is found by clear and convincing evidence that
such property was to have been derived from, used, or intended to be used
to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01,
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(3) (2) Following the filing of an information charging a violation
of a covered offense the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1)
of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 that specifically seeks forfeiture of any
property listed in subsection (2) (1) of this section, the defendant may
request a pretrial hearing to determine the existence of probable cause
to believe that the property specifically sought to be forfeited was
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1)
-15-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. The request for a hearing pursuant to
this section must be filed with the district court in which the criminal
proceeding is pending within thirty days after the filing of the
information.
(4)(a) (3) At any time after the filing of the information in
district court and prior to final disposition of the criminal case, any
person or entity, other than the defendant, with a claimed legal interest
in the property may petition to intervene in the district court with
jurisdiction over the criminal case for the specific and limited purpose
of demonstrating such person's his, her, or its legal interest in the
property and such person's his, her, or its lack of actual knowledge that
such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to
facilitate a covered offense in violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01,
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(b) In the petition to intervene, the intervening person or entity
shall, at a minimum, state facts demonstrating such person's his, her, or
its legal interest in the property and such person's his, her, or its
lack of actual knowledge regarding the use or intended use of the
property.
(5) Within thirty days after filing a motion to intervene, the
district court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing on the matter. At the
conclusion of such hearing, the court may order that any or all of the
property be returned to the intervening claimant after it is no longer
needed as evidence in the criminal case upon a showing by the claimant by
a preponderance of the evidence:
(a) That the claimant that he, she, or it has a legally recognized
interest in the property; and
(b) Either either (i) that such property was acquired by the
claimant in good faith and the claimant he, she, or it did not have
-16-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
actual knowledge that such property was derived from, used, or intended
to be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or
(ii) that the property seized was not derived from, used, or intended to
be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(6) The court, on its own motion or upon application of the
intervening claimant, may permit the claimant such person to proceed in
forma pauperis under sections 25-2301 to 25-2310. The court, on its own
motion or upon application of the intervening claimant, may appoint
counsel to represent the claimant such person if the claimant such person
is indigent. If the claimant he or she asserts indigency, the court shall
make a reasonable inquiry to determine the claimant's such person's
financial condition and may require the claimant him or her to execute an
affidavit of indigency for filing with the clerk of the court.
(7) (4) After conviction but prior to sentencing for a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1)
of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 in cases in which the prosecuting
authority has specifically requested forfeiture of property, the district
court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing at which the prosecuting
authority must prove by clear and convincing evidence what specific
amount or portion of the property specifically enumerated in the criminal
information was derived from, used, or intended for use in furtherance of
a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act,
subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. At the conclusion of such
hearing, the court shall make specific findings of fact indicating what
amount or portion of the property sought to be forfeited by the state was
-17-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1)
of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. The court shall order any amount or
portion of the property not proven by the state to be derived from, used,
or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the
Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or
section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or
28-1107 or the fair market value of the legally recognized interest in
such property be returned to its rightful and legal owner or interest
holder.
(8)(a) (5)(a) The court shall order that any amount or portion of
property proven by the state by clear and convincing evidence to be
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1)
of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 be forfeited to the state and disposition
of such property be conducted in accordance with this subsection and
section 28-1439.02 at such time as the property is no longer required as
evidence in any criminal proceeding.
(b) As part of any disposition of property, the court may order
that: (i) Any money, securities, or negotiable instruments be distributed
as provided in Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska;
(ii) any conveyances be sold or put to official use by the seizing agency
for a period of not more than one year and when such property is no
longer necessary for official use or at the end of two years, whichever
comes first, such property shall be sold. Proceeds from the sale of any
conveyance shall be distributed as provided in Article VII, section 5, of
the Constitution of Nebraska; (iii) any electronic communication devices
as defined in section 28-833, any equipment, components, peripherals,
software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication
-18-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
devices, or any gambling devices as defined in section 28-1101 be
destroyed by a law enforcement agency; and (iv) the disposition of
firearms shall be effectuated pursuant to section 29-820.
(c) As used in this subsection, official use means use directly in
connection with enforcement of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, the
Uniform Controlled Substances Act, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102,
28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(9) (6) Any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices; as defined in section
28-833, any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or
accessories related to electronic communication devices; , or any
gambling devices as defined in section 28-1101 may be forfeited pursuant
to a plea agreement between the state and the defendant subject to notice
to or approval of the court.
(10) (7) Subdivision (2)(a) (1)(a) of this section does not apply if
the owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United
States before charges are filed or a conviction obtained.
(11) (8) Subdivision (2)(b) (1)(b) of this section does not apply if
the owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United
States before charges are filed so long as the statute of limitations for
a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act,
subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 has not expired.
(12) (9) Subdivision (2)(a) (1)(a) of this section does not apply if
the owner or possessor of the property is unknown or incapable of being
determined for some legitimate reason or fails to appear in court as
ordered after prosecution for a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 is
commenced and is not apprehended within twelve months after the failure
to appear order was issued by the court.
-19-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(13) (10) If the owner or possessor of the property fails to appear
in court as ordered after prosecution for a covered offense violation of
the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416,
or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or
28-1107 is commenced but appears or is apprehended within twelve months
after the failure to appear order was issued by the court, the court may
order the owner or possessor of the property, as a part of any sentence
imposed for either the failure to appear or the conviction for a covered
offense of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107, to pay a storage fee of one hundred dollars per
month for each month the property was held following the issuance of the
failure to appear order.
Sec. 14. Section 28-1602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1602 (1) The prosecuting authority must specifically plead its
intent to seek forfeiture of any property upon a conviction for a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1)
of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 in the same criminal information charging
the underlying covered offense violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01,
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(2) In pleading its intent to seek forfeiture, the information shall
specifically (a) state the date the property was seized, (b) state the
place the property was seized from, (c) describe the property sought to
be forfeited, and (d) if known, state the name of the owner of the
property, the name of the person or persons in possession of the property
or in physical proximity to the property when it was seized, and the name
of any other person or entity that may have a claim or interest in the
property.
-20-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
Sec. 15. Section 28-1701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1701 (1) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an
eligible alcohol or drug offense if such person witnessed or was the
victim of a sexual assault and such person:
(a) Either:
(i) In good faith, reported such sexual assault to law enforcement;
or
(ii) Requested emergency medical assistance for the victim of the
sexual assault; and
(b) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the eligible
alcohol or drug offense was obtained or discovered as a result of such
person reporting such sexual assault to law enforcement or requesting
emergency medical assistance.
(2) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an eligible
alcohol or drug offense if:
(a) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the person for
the offense was obtained or discovered as a result of the investigation
or prosecution of a sexual assault; and
(b) Such person cooperates with law enforcement in the investigation
or prosecution of the sexual assault.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible alcohol or drug offense means:
(i) A violation of subsection (3) or (13) of section 28-416 or of
section 28-441;
(ii) A violation of section 53-180.02 committed by a person older
than eighteen years of age and under the age of twenty-one years, as
described in subdivision (4)(a) of section 53-180.05;
(iii) A violation of a city or village ordinance similar to
subdivision (3)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section; or
(iv) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
-21-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses in subdivision (3)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
section as the underlying offense; and
(b) Sexual assault means:
(i) A violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04,
28-322.05, or 28-703, or section 5 of this act 28-1463.03, sex
trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor under section 28-831, or
subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e),
or (f) of section 28-707; or
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses listed in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section
as the underlying offense.
Sec. 16. Section 29-110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-110 (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for any felony unless the indictment is found by a grand jury
within three years next after the offense has been done or committed or
unless a complaint for the same is filed before the magistrate within
three years next after the offense has been done or committed and a
warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted, tried, or punished for any misdemeanor or other indictable
offense below the grade of felony or for any fine or forfeiture under any
penal statute unless the suit, information, or indictment for such
offense is instituted or found within one year and six months from the
time of committing the offense or incurring the fine or forfeiture or
within one year for any offense the punishment of which is restricted by
a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars and to imprisonment not
exceeding three months.
-22-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for kidnapping under section 28-313, false imprisonment under
section 28-314 or 28-315, child abuse under section 28-707, pandering
under section 28-802, debauching a minor under section 28-805, or an
offense under section 28-813 when the victim is under sixteen years of
age at the time of the offense (a) unless the indictment for such offense
is found by a grand jury within seven years next after the offense has
been committed or within seven years next after the victim's sixteenth
birthday, whichever is later, or (b) unless a complaint for such offense
is filed before the magistrate within seven years next after the offense
has been committed or within seven years next after the victim's
sixteenth birthday, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of
the defendant has been issued.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of section 28-831 (a)
unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within
seven years next after the offense has been committed or within seven
years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is later, or
(b) unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate
within seven years next after the offense has been committed or within
seven years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is
later, and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for an offense under section 3 or 4 of this act 28-813.01 or
28-1463.05 (a) unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand
jury within seven years next after the offense has been committed or
within seven years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever
is later, or (b) unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within seven years next after the offense has been committed
or within seven years next after the victim's eighteenth birthday,
whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has
-23-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
been issued.
(6) No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of the Securities
Act of Nebraska under section 8-1117 unless the indictment for such
offense is found by a grand jury within five years next after the offense
has been done or committed or unless a complaint for such offense is
filed before the magistrate within five years next after the offense has
been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has
been issued.
(7) No person shall be prosecuted for criminal impersonation under
section 28-638, identity theft under section 28-639, or identity fraud
under section 28-640 unless the indictment for such offense is found by a
grand jury within five years next after the offense has been done or
committed or unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within five years next after the offense has been done or
committed and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(8) No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of section 68-1017
if the aggregate value of all funds and other benefits obtained or
attempted to be obtained is five hundred dollars or more unless the
indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within five years
next after the offense has been done or committed or unless a complaint
for such offense is filed before the magistrate within five years next
after the offense has been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest
of the defendant has been issued.
(9) No person shall be prosecuted for knowing and intentional abuse,
neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult under
section 28-386 unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand
jury within six years next after the offense has been done or committed
or unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate
within six years next after the offense has been done or committed and a
warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(10) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
-24-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
prosecuted for an offense under section 28-717 (a) unless the indictment
for such offense is found by a grand jury within one year and six months
next after the offense has been committed or within one year and six
months next after the child reaches the age of majority, whichever is
later, or (b) unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within one year and six months next after the offense has been
committed or within one year and six months next after the child reaches
the age of majority, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of
the defendant has been issued.
(11) There shall not be any time limitations for prosecution or
punishment for treason, murder, arson, forgery, sexual assault in the
first or second degree under section 28-319 or 28-320, sexual assault of
a child in the second or third degree under section 28-320.01, incest
under section 28-703, sexual assault of a child in the first degree under
section 28-319.01, labor trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a
minor under subsection (1) of section 28-831, or an offense under section
5 of this act 28-1463.03; nor shall there be any time limitations for
prosecution or punishment for sexual assault in the third degree under
section 28-320 when the victim is under sixteen years of age at the time
of the offense.
(12) The time limitations prescribed in this section shall include
all inchoate offenses pursuant to the Nebraska Criminal Code and
compounding a felony pursuant to section 28-301.
(13) The time limitations prescribed in this section shall not
extend to any person fleeing from justice.
(14) When any suit, information, or indictment for any crime or
misdemeanor is limited by any statute to be brought or exhibited within
any other time than is limited by this section, then the suit,
information, or indictment shall be brought or exhibited within the time
limited by such statute.
(15) If any suit, information, or indictment is quashed or the
-25-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
proceedings set aside or reversed on writ of error, the time during the
pendency of such suit, information, or indictment so quashed, set aside,
or reversed shall not be reckoned within this statute so as to bar any
new suit, information, or indictment for the same offense.
(16) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 943, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to April 16, 2004, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(17) The changes made to this section by Laws 2005, LB 713, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to September 4, 2005, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(18) The changes made to this section by Laws 2009, LB 97, and Laws
2006, LB 1199, shall apply to offenses committed prior to May 21, 2009,
for which the statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and
to offenses committed on or after such date.
(19) The changes made to this section by Laws 2010, LB809, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to July 15, 2010, for which the statute
of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed
on or after such date.
(20) The changes made to this section by Laws 2016, LB934, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to April 19, 2016, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(21) The changes made to this section by Laws 2019, LB519, shall
apply to offenses committed prior to September 1, 2019, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
Sec. 17. Section 29-119, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-119 For purposes of this section and sections 23-1201, 29-120,
-26-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
and 29-2261, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) A plea agreement means that as a result of a discussion between
the defense counsel and the prosecuting attorney:
(a) A charge is to be dismissed or reduced; or
(b) A defendant, if he or she pleads guilty to a charge, may receive
less than the maximum penalty permitted by law; and
(2)(a) Victim means a person who has had a personal confrontation
with an offender as a result of a homicide under sections 28-302 to
28-306, a first degree assault under section 28-308, a second degree
assault under section 28-309, a third degree assault under section 28-310
when the victim is an intimate partner as defined in section 28-323, a
first degree false imprisonment under section 28-314, a first degree
sexual assault under section 28-319, a sexual assault of a child in the
first degree under section 28-319.01, a second or third degree sexual
assault under section 28-320, a sexual assault of a child in the second
or third degree under section 28-320.01, domestic assault in the first,
second, or third degree under section 28-323, or a robbery under section
28-324. Victim also includes a person who has suffered serious bodily
injury as defined in section 28-109 as a result of a motor vehicle
accident when the driver was charged with a violation of section 60-6,196
or 60-6,197 or with a violation of a city or village ordinance enacted in
conformance with either section.
(b) In the case of a homicide, victim means the nearest surviving
relative under the law as provided by section 30-2303 but does not
include the alleged perpetrator of the homicide.
(c) In the case of a violation of the Child Pornography Prevention
Act section 28-813.01, 28-1463.03, 28-1463.04, or 28-1463.05, victim
means a person who was a child as defined in section 2 of this act
28-1463.02 and a participant or portrayed observer in the child
pornography that visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which is
the subject of the violation and who has been identified and can be
-27-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
reasonably notified.
(d) In the case of a sexual assault of a child or a violation of the
Child Pornography Prevention Act , a possession offense of a visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct, or a distribution offense of a
visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct, victim means the child
victim and the parents, guardians, or duly appointed legal representative
of the child victim but does not include the alleged perpetrator of the
crime.
(e) Victim also includes a person who was the victim of a theft
under section 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, or 28-517 when (i) the value of the
thing involved is five thousand dollars or more and (ii) the victim and
perpetrator were intimate partners as defined in section 28-323.
(f) Victim also includes a sexual assault victim as defined in
section 29-4309.
Sec. 18. Section 29-4003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4003 (1)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any
person who on or after January 1, 1997:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any of the following:
(A) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except when
the person is the parent of the minor and was not convicted of any other
offense in this section;
(B) False imprisonment of a minor pursuant to section 28-314 or
28-315;
(C) Sexual assault pursuant to section 28-319 or 28-320;
(D) Sexual abuse by a school employee pursuant to section 28-316.01;
(E) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree pursuant
to section 28-320.01;
(F) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to
section 28-319.01;
-28-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(G) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or senior adult pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386;
(H) Incest of a minor pursuant to section 28-703;
(I) Pandering of a minor pursuant to section 28-802;
(J) Conduct relating to child pornography under section 5 of this
act Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct of a child pursuant to
section 28-1463.03 or subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of section 4 of this act
28-1463.05;
(K) Knowingly possessing or receiving any child pornography visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its
participants or portrayed observers pursuant to subsection (1) or (5) (4)
of section 3 of this act 28-813.01;
(L) Criminal child enticement pursuant to section 28-311;
(M) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication device
pursuant to section 28-320.02;
(N) Debauching a minor pursuant to section 28-805; or
(O) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory,
or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(a)(i)(A)
through (1)(a)(i)(N) of this section;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon;
(iii) Is incarcerated in a jail, a penal or correctional facility,
or any other public or private institution or is under probation or
parole as a result of pleading guilty to or being found guilty of a
registrable offense under subdivision (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section
-29-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
prior to January 1, 1997; or
(iv) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender
under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory,
commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.
(b) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivision (1)(a)
of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person
who on or after January 1, 2010:
(i)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(i)(B) of this
section, has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any of the following:
(I) Murder in the first degree pursuant to section 28-303;
(II) Murder in the second degree pursuant to section 28-304;
(III) Manslaughter pursuant to section 28-305;
(IV) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;
(V) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;
(VI) Assault in the third degree pursuant to section 28-310;
(VII) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03;
(VIII) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under
the act pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;
(IX) Kidnapping pursuant to section 28-313;
(X) False imprisonment pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;
(XI) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree
pursuant to section 28-322.02;
(XII) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree
pursuant to section 28-322.03;
(XIII) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section
28-322.04;
(XIV) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;
(XV) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section
28-707;
(XVI) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to
-30-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
section 28-833; or
(XVII) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an
accessory, or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)
(b)(i)(A)(I) through (1)(b)(i)(A)(XVI) of this section.
(B) In order for the Sex Offender Registration Act to apply to the
offenses listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V),
(VI), (VII), (IX), and (X) of this section, a court shall have found that
evidence of sexual penetration or sexual contact, as those terms are
defined in section 28-318, was present in the record, which shall include
consideration of the factual basis for a plea-based conviction and
information contained in the presentence report;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon; or
(iii) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender
under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory,
commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.
(c) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)
(a) and (b) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to
any person who on or after January 1, 2020:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(c)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
-31-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.
(d) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)
(a), (b), and (c) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act
applies to any person who on or after January 1, 2023:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of human trafficking under subsection (1) or (2) of section
28-831, and the court determines either by notification of sex offender
registration responsibilities or notation in the sentencing order that
the human trafficking was sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor
and not solely labor trafficking or labor trafficking of a minor; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable
offense under subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other
military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a
procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or
any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.
(2) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense under
this section shall be required to comply with the act during the appeals
process.
Sec. 19. Section 29-4309, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4309 For the purposes of the Sexual Assault Victims' Bill of
Rights Act:
(1)(a) Advocate means:
(i) Any employee or supervised volunteer of a domestic violence and
sexual assault victim assistance program or of any other agency,
-32-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
business, or organization that is not affiliated with a law enforcement
or prosecutor's office, whose primary purpose is assisting domestic
violence and sexual assault victims. This includes employees or
supervised volunteers of an Indian tribe or a postsecondary educational
institution;
(ii) A representative from a victim and witness assistance center as
established in sections 81-1845 to 81-1847 or a similar entity affiliated
with a law enforcement agency or prosecutor's office; or
(iii) An advocate who is employed by a child advocacy center that
meets the requirements of subsection (2) of section 28-728.
(b) If reasonably possible, an advocate shall speak the victim's
preferred language or use the services of a qualified interpreter;
(2) Health care provider means any individual who is licensed,
certified, or registered to perform specified health services consistent
with state law;
(3) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01,
28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04,
28-322.05, or 28-703, or section 5 of this act 28-1463.03, sex
trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor under section 28-831, or
subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e),
or (f) of section 28-707;
(4) Sexual assault forensic evidence means evidence collected by a
health care provider contained within any sexual assault forensic
evidence collection kit, including a toxicology kit, or any forensic
evidence collected by law enforcement through the course of an
investigation; and
(5)(a) Sexual assault victim or victim means any person who is a
victim of sexual assault who reports such sexual assault:
(i) To a health care provider, law enforcement, or an advocate,
including anonymous reporting as provided in section 28-902; and
(ii) In the case of a victim who is under eighteen years of age, to
-33-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
the Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Sexual assault victim or victim also includes, if the victim
described in subdivision (5)(a) of this section is incompetent, deceased,
or a minor who is unable to consent to counseling services, such victim's
parent, guardian, or spouse, unless such person is the reported
assailant.
Sec. 20. Section 29-4316, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4316 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Criminal justice agency has the same meaning as in section
29-3509;
(b) Sex trafficking means sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a
minor in violation of section 28-831; and
(c) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01,
28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04,
28-322.05, or 28-703, or section 5 of this act 28-1463.03 or subdivision
(1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of
section 28-707.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and unless
otherwise required by statute, a criminal justice agency and any attorney
involved in the investigation or prosecution of an alleged sexual assault
or sex trafficking violation shall maintain the confidentiality of the
identity and personal identifying information of the alleged victim. Such
information may be shared by such criminal justice agencies and between
such criminal justice agencies and attorneys as necessary to carry out
their duties.
(3) The confidentiality required by subsection (2) of this section
does not apply:
(a) To the extent waived by the alleged victim;
(b) If criminal charges involving the alleged sexual assault or sex
trafficking are filed;
-34-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(c) If the victim has died as a result of, or in connection with,
the alleged sexual assault or sex trafficking;
(d) In cases where personal identifying information or the identity
of the victim are released as part of a child abduction alert system used
by law enforcement agencies, such as the AMBER Alert system;
(e) To a person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect
as required in section 28-711;
(f) To the sharing of reports and information regarding child abuse
and neglect with a child abuse and neglect investigation team or child
abuse and neglect treatment team provided for in section 28-728;
(g) To the Department of Health and Human Services and other
assisting agencies as necessary to carry out their duties in
investigations of child abuse or neglect;
(h) To communication with an individual that an educational entity,
as defined in section 79-1201.01, has designated:
(i) As a Title IX coordinator; or
(ii) To receive reports related to sexual assault or sex trafficking
or to provide supportive measures related to such reports; or
(i) To communication with advocates and health care providers as
defined in section 29-4309.
Sec. 21. Section 83-174.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.02 (1) The Department of Correctional Services shall order an
evaluation of the following individuals by a mental health professional
to determine whether or not the individual is a dangerous sex offender:
(a) Individuals who have been convicted of (i) sexual assault of a
child in the first degree pursuant to section 28-319.01 or (ii) sexual
assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-319;
(b) Individuals who have been convicted of two or more offenses
requiring registration as a sex offender under section 29-4003 if one of
the convictions was for any of the following offenses: (i) Kidnapping of
-35-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except when the person is the parent
of the minor and was not convicted of any other offense; (ii) sexual
assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-319 or sexual assault
in the second degree pursuant to section 28-320; (iii) sexual assault of
a child pursuant to section 28-320.01; (iv) sexual assault of a child in
the first degree pursuant to section 28-319.01; (v) sexual assault of a
child in the second or third degree pursuant to section 28-320.01; (vi)
sexual assault of a vulnerable adult or senior adult pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386; (vii) incest of a minor pursuant to
section 28-703; (viii) conduct relating to child pornography under
section 5 of this act visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct of a
child pursuant to section 28-1463.03; or (ix) any offense that is
substantially equivalent to an offense listed in this section by any
state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, or by court-martial or other
military tribunal, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to
that described in section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a
conviction other than by pardon;
(c) Individuals convicted of a sex offense against a minor who have
refused to participate in or failed to successfully complete the sex
offender treatment program offered by the Department of Correctional
Services or the Department of Health and Human Services during the term
of incarceration. The failure to successfully complete a treatment
program due to time constraints or the unavailability of treatment
programming shall not constitute a refusal to participate in treatment;
and
(d) Individuals convicted of failure to comply with the registration
requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act who have previously
been convicted for failure to comply with the registration requirements
of the act or a similar registration requirement in another state.
(2) The evaluation required by this section shall be ordered at
-36-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
least one hundred eighty days before the scheduled release of the
individual. Upon completion of the evaluation, and not later than one
hundred fifty days prior to the scheduled release of the individual, the
department shall send written notice to the Attorney General, the county
attorney of the county where the offender is incarcerated, and the
prosecuting county attorney. The notice shall contain an affidavit of the
mental health professional describing his or her findings with respect to
whether or not the individual is a dangerous sex offender.
Sec. 22. Section 84-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-205 The duties of the Attorney General shall be:
(1) To appear and defend actions and claims against the state;
(2) To investigate, commence, and prosecute any and all actions
resulting from violations of sections 32-1401 to 32-1417;
(3) To consult with and advise the county attorneys, when requested
by them, in all criminal matters and in matters relating to the public
revenue. He or she shall have authority to require aid and assistance of
the county attorney in all matters pertaining to the duties of the
Attorney General in the county of such county attorney and may, in any
case brought to the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court from any county,
demand and receive the assistance of the county attorney from whose
county such case is brought;
(4) To give, when required, without fee, his or her opinion in
writing upon all questions of law submitted to him or her by the
Governor, head of any executive department, Secretary of State, State
Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Board of Educational Lands and
Funds, State Department of Education, Public Service Commission, or
Legislature;
(5) At the request of the Governor, head of any executive
department, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public
Accounts, Board of Educational Lands and Funds, State Department of
-37-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
Education, or Public Service Commission, to prosecute any official bond
or any contract in which the state is interested which is deposited with
any of them and to prosecute or defend for the state all civil or
criminal actions and proceedings relating to any matter connected with
any of such officers' departments if, after investigation, he or she is
convinced there is sufficient legal merit to justify the proceeding. Such
officers shall not pay or contract to pay from the funds of the state any
money for special attorneys or counselors-at-law unless the employment of
such special counsel is made upon the written authorization of the
Governor or the Attorney General;
(6) To enforce the proper application of money appropriated by the
Legislature to the various funds of the state and prosecute breaches of
trust in the administration of such funds;
(7) To prepare, when requested by the Governor, Secretary of State,
State Treasurer, or Auditor of Public Accounts or any other executive
department, proper drafts for contracts, forms, or other writings which
may be wanted for the use of the state and report to the Legislature,
whenever requested, upon any business pertaining to the duties of his or
her office. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically;
(8) To pay all money received, belonging to the people of the state,
immediately upon receipt thereof, into the state treasury;
(9) To keep a record in proper books provided for that purpose at
the expense of the state, a register of all actions and demands
prosecuted or defended by him or her in behalf of the state and all
proceedings had in relation thereto, and deliver the same to his or her
successor in office;
(10) To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all civil or
criminal actions and proceedings in the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court
in which the state is interested or a party. When requested by the
Governor or the Legislature, the Attorney General shall appear for the
-38-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
state and prosecute or defend any action or conduct any investigation in
which the state is interested or a party before any court, officer,
board, tribunal, or commission;
(11) To prepare and promulgate model rules of procedure appropriate
for use by as many agencies as possible. The Attorney General shall add
to, amend, or revise the model rules as necessary for the proper guidance
of agencies;
(12) To include within the budget of the office sufficient funding
to assure oversight and representation of the State of Nebraska for
district court appeals of administrative license revocation proceedings
under section 60-498.04;
(13)(a) To create a Child Protection Division to be staffed by at
least three assistant attorneys general who each have five or more years
of experience in the prosecution or defense of felonies or misdemeanors,
including two years in the prosecution or defense of crimes against
children. Upon the written request of a county attorney, the division
shall provide consultation and advise and assist in the preparation of
the trial of any case involving a crime against a child, including, but
not limited to, the following offenses:
(i) Murder as defined in sections 28-303 and 28-304;
(ii) Manslaughter as defined in section 28-305;
(iii) Kidnapping as defined in section 28-313;
(iv) False imprisonment as defined in sections 28-314 and 28-315;
(v) Child abuse as defined in section 28-707;
(vi) Pandering as defined in section 28-802;
(vii) Debauching a minor as defined in section 28-805; and
(viii) Offenses listed in the Child Pornography Prevention Act or
section sections 28-813 , 28-813.01, and 28-1463.03.
(b) Any offense listed in subdivisions (13)(a)(i) through (viii) of
this section shall include all inchoate offenses pursuant to the Nebraska
Criminal Code and compounding a felony pursuant to section 28-301. Such
-39-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
crimes shall not include matters involving dependent and neglected
children, infraction violations, custody, parenting time, visitation, or
other access matters, or child support. If the county attorney declines
in writing to prosecute a case involving a crime against a child because
of an ethical consideration, including the presence or appearance of a
conflict of interest, or for any other reason, the division shall, upon
the receipt of a written request of the county attorney, the Department
of Health and Human Services, the minor child, the parents of the minor
child, or any other interested party, investigate the matter and either
decline to prosecute the matter or initiate the appropriate criminal
proceedings in a court of proper jurisdiction.
(c) For purposes of this subdivision (13), child or children shall
mean an individual or individuals sixteen years of age or younger; and
(14) To enforce the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.
Sec. 23. Section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
87-302 (a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in
the course of his or her business, vocation, or occupation, he or she:
(1) Passes off goods or services as those of another;
(2) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the
source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;
(3) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to
affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by,
another;
(4) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic
origin in connection with goods or services;
(5) Represents that goods or services have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do
not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status,
affiliation, or connection that he or she does not have;
(6) Represents that goods or services do not have sponsorship,
-40-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities
that they have or that a person does not have a sponsorship, approval,
status, affiliation, or connection that he or she has;
(7) Represents that goods are original or new if they are
deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand,
except that sellers may repair damage to and make adjustments on or
replace parts of otherwise new goods in an effort to place such goods in
compliance with factory specifications;
(8) Represents that goods or services are of a particular standard,
quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if
they are of another;
(9) Disparages the goods, services, or business of another by false
or misleading representation of fact;
(10) Advertises goods or services with intent not to sell them as
advertised or advertises the price in any manner calculated or tending to
mislead or in any way deceive a person;
(11) Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply
reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a
limitation of quantity;
(12) Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the
reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;
(13) Uses or promotes the use of or establishes, operates, or
participates in a pyramid promotional scheme in connection with the
solicitation of such scheme to members of the public. This subdivision
shall not be construed to prohibit a plan or operation, or to define a
plan or operation as a pyramid promotional scheme, based on the fact that
participants in the plan or operation give consideration in return for
the right to receive compensation based upon purchases of goods,
services, or intangible property by participants for personal use,
consumption, or resale so long as the plan or operation does not promote
or induce inventory loading and the plan or operation implements an
-41-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
appropriate inventory repurchase program;
(14) With respect to a sale or lease to a natural person of goods or
services purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, household,
or agricultural purposes, uses or employs any referral or chain referral
sales technique, plan, arrangement, or agreement;
(15) Knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a privacy
policy, published on the Internet or otherwise distributed or published,
regarding the use of personal information submitted by members of the
public;
(16) Uses any scheme or device to defraud by means of:
(i) Obtaining money or property by knowingly false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises; or
(ii) Selling, distributing, supplying, furnishing, or procuring any
property for the purpose of furthering such scheme;
(17) Offers an unsolicited check, through the mail or by other
means, to promote goods or services if the cashing or depositing of the
check obligates the endorser or payee identified on the check to pay for
goods or services. This subdivision does not apply to an extension of
credit or an offer to lend money;
(18) Mails or causes to be sent an unsolicited billing statement,
invoice, or other document that appears to obligate the consumer to make
a payment for services or merchandise he or she did not order;
(19)(i) Installs, offers to install, or makes available for
installation or download a covered file-sharing program on a computer not
owned by such person without providing clear and conspicuous notice to
the owner or authorized user of the computer that files on that computer
will be made available to the public and without requiring intentional
and affirmative activation of the file-sharing function of such covered
file-sharing program by the owner or authorized user of the computer; or
(ii) Prevents reasonable efforts to block the installation,
execution, or disabling of a covered file-sharing program;
-42-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(20) Violates any provision of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection
Act;
(21) In connection with the solicitation of funds or other assets
for any charitable purpose, or in connection with any solicitation which
represents that funds or assets will be used for any charitable purpose,
uses or employs any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise,
misrepresentation, unfair practice, or concealment, suppression, or
omission of any material fact;
(22)(i) In the manufacture, production, importation, distribution,
promotion, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sale of
a substance:
(A) Makes a deceptive or misleading representation or designation,
or omits material information, about a substance or fails to identify the
contents of the package or the nature of the substance contained inside
the package; or
(B) Causes confusion or misunderstanding as to the effects a
substance causes when ingested, injected, inhaled, or otherwise
introduced into the human body.
(ii) A person shall be deemed to have committed a violation of the
Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act for each individually packaged
product that is either manufactured, produced, imported, distributed,
promoted, displayed for sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or
sold in violation of this section. A violation under this subdivision (a)
(22) shall be treated as a separate and distinct violation from any other
offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the
person was in violation of this section;
(23)(i) Manufactures, produces, publishes, distributes, monetizes,
promotes, or otherwise makes publicly available any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, any obscene material, or any material that is
harmful to minors in which any person depicted as a participant or
observer:
-43-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
(A) Is under eighteen years of age;
(B) Is a trafficking victim;
(C) Has not expressly and voluntarily consented to such person's
depiction; or
(D) Participated in any act depicted without consent.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(23) does not apply to any
telecommunications service.
(iii) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(23):
(A) Harmful to minors has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 254, as
such section existed on January 1, 2024;
(B) Obscene material has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(C) Promote means to use any mechanism or publication, or take any
action, that suggests, highlights, advertises, markets, curates,
backlinks, hashtags, or otherwise directs, attempts to direct, or
encourages traffic toward specific materials, including acts carried out
affirmatively, through automation, algorithmically, and via other
technical means both known and unknown at this time;
(D) Publish means to communicate or make information available to
another person via an Internet website, regardless of whether the person
consuming, viewing, or receiving the material gives any consideration for
the published material;
(E) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830;
(F) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct has the same
meaning as in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02; and
(G) Without consent has the same meaning as in section 28-318; or
(24) Offers or enters into a right-to-list home sale agreement as
defined in section 81-885.01.
(b) In order to prevail in an action under the Uniform Deceptive
Trade Practices Act, a complainant need not prove competition between the
parties.
(c) This section does not affect unfair trade practices otherwise
-44-

LB172 LB172
2025 2025
actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.
Sec. 24. Original sections 25-21,291, 27-1301, 28-116, 28-320.02,
28-813.02, 28-833, 28-1463.01, 28-1463.02, 28-1463.06, 28-1601, 28-1602,
83-174.02, 84-205, and 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
sections 28-813.01, 28-1463.03, 28-1463.05, 28-1701, 29-110, 29-119,
29-4003, 29-4309, and 29-4316, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
Sec. 25. The following section is outright repealed: Section
28-1463.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-45-